Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-565
Council; purpose; collaboration.

(1) The purpose of the council shall be to examine (a) the needs of aging individuals and individuals living with Alzheimer's disease or other dementia, (b) the services available in the state for those individuals and their family caregivers, and (c) the ability of health care providers and facilities to meet the current and future needs of such individuals.

(2) The council shall collaborate with the department and other state departments as needed to gather input on issues and strategies that pertain to aging, Alzheimer's disease, and other dementia and identify proactive approaches on public health, workforce, caregiver support, and care delivery. The council shall monitor analysis, policy development, and program implementation related to aging, Alzheimer's disease, and other dementia.

Laws 2022, LB752, § 34;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 16.
July 18, 2026